src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_okko_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:


  Noun - okko:
    okko+N+Sg+Nom:  okko
    okko+N+Sg+Gen:  oho
    okko+N+Sg+Acc:  oho
    okko+N+Sg+Ill:  ookon
    okko+N+Sg+Loc:  ohhoost
    okko+N+Sg+Com:  ohhoin
    okko+N+Sg+Abe:  ohottáá
    okko+N+Ess:  okkon
    okko+N+Par:  okkod
    okko+N+Pl+Nom:  ohoh
    okko+N+Pl+Gen:  ohoi
    okko+N+Pl+Acc:  ohoid
    okko+N+Pl+Ill:  ohhoid
    okko+N+Pl+Loc:  ohoin
    okko+N+Pl+Com:  [ohoiguin, ohoigijn]
    okko+N+Pl+Abe:  ohoittáá

  Noun - lukko:
    lukko+N+Sg+Nom:  lukko
    lukko+N+Sg+Gen:  luho
    lukko+N+Sg+Acc:  luho
    lukko+N+Sg+Ill:  luukon
    lukko+N+Sg+Loc:  luhhoost
    lukko+N+Sg+Com:  luhhoin
    lukko+N+Sg+Abe:  luhottáá
    lukko+N+Ess:  lukkon
    lukko+N+Par:  lukkod
    lukko+N+Pl+Nom:  luhoh
    lukko+N+Pl+Gen:  luhoi
    lukko+N+Pl+Acc:  luhoid
    lukko+N+Pl+Ill:  luhhoid
    lukko+N+Pl+Loc:  luhoin
    lukko+N+Pl+Com:  [luhoiguin, luhoigijn]
    lukko+N+Pl+Abe:  luhoittáá
